Washington statutes.
RCW 43.19.647

Purchase of biofuels and biofuel blends—Contracting authority.

(1) In order to allow the motor vehicle fuel needs of state and local government to be satisfied by Washington-produced biofuels as provided in this chapter, the department of enterprise services as well as local governments may contract in advance and execute contracts with public or private producers, suppliers, or other parties, for the purchase of appropriate biofuels, as that term is defined in *RCW 43.325.010, and biofuel blends. Contract provisions may address items including, but not limited to, fuel standards, price, and delivery date.

(2) The department of enterprise services may combine the needs of local government agencies, including ports, special districts, school districts, and municipal corporations, for the purposes of executing contracts for biofuels and to secure a sufficient and stable supply of alternative fuels.

[ 2015 c 225 s 65; 2007 c 348 s 203.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 43.325.010 expired June 30, 2016.

Findings—2007 c 348: See RCW 43.325.005.